Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HMONG TOWN CONNECTIONS ARTS SPACE.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Hmong Town Connections to renovate and create arts space at the Maplewood Sears complex. new text end